en: Refrigerated semolina pudding
fr: Semoule au lait rayon frais

en: Semolina puddings with raisins and caramel sauce
fr: Gâteaux de semoule aux raisins et au caramel

en: Refrigerated semolina puddings with raisins and caramel sauce
fr: Gâteaux de semoule aux raisins et au caramel rayon frais

en: Fresh cream cheese cake
fr: Gâteau au fromage blanc

en: Vegan tiramisu
fr: Tiramisu vegan

en: Tiramisu
xx: Tiramisu
bg: Тирамису
de: Tiramisu
es: Tiramisu
fi: tiramisu
fr: Tiramisu
it: Tiramisù
ja: ティラミス
lt: Tiramisas
nl: Tiramisu
pl: Tiramisu

en: Fruit tiramisu
es: Tiramisú de frutas
fr: Tiramisu aux fruits
hr: Voćni tiramisu
it: Tiramisù alla frutta
ja: フルーツティラミス
lt: Vaisių tiramisas
nl: Fruit tiramisu
pl: Tiramisu owocowe

en: Chocolate tiramisu
es: Tiramisú de chocolate
fr: Tiramisu au chocolat
hr: Čokoladni tiramisu
it: Tiramisù al cioccolato
ja: チョコレートティラミス
lt: Šokoladinis tiramisas
nl: Chocolade tiramisu
pl: Tiramisu czekoladowe

en: Coffee tiramisu
es: Tiramisú de café
fr: Tiramisu au café
hr: Tiramisu od kave
it: Tiramisù al caffè
ja: コーヒーティラミス
lt: Kavos tiramisas
nl: Koffie tiramisu
pl: Tiramisu z kawą

en: Opera cakes, Opera cake, Dessert Opera cake type
es: Tarta ópera
fr: Opéra
hr: Operna torta
ja: オペラ

en: Framboisiers, Raspberries sponge cake, Sponge sandwich cake filled and topped with raspberries
fr: Framboisiers, Framboisier

en: Fraisiers, Sponge sandwich cake filled and topped with strawberries
fr: Fraisiers, Fraisier

en: Saint-Honoré cakes
xx: Saint-Honoré
fr: Saint-Honoré

en: Fruit salads
bg: Плодови салати
de: Fruchtsalate, Obstsalate
es: Ensaladas de frutas
fi: hedelmäsalaatit
fr: Salades de fruits
hr: Voćne salate
it: Macedonia, Insalate di frutta
lt: Vaisių salotos
nl: Fruitsalade

en: Fruit salads in syrup
es: Ensaladas de frutas en almíbar
fi: Hedelmäsalaatit siirapissa
fr: Salades de fruits au sirop
hr: Voćne salate u saftu
it: Insalate di frutta sciroppate
ja: シロップ漬けフルーツサラダ
lt: Vaisių salotos su sirupu
nl: Fruitsalade in siroop
pl: Sałatki owocowe w syropie

en: Canned drained fruit cocktail in syrup, Canned drained fruit salad in syrup
fr: Macédoine de fruits au sirop appertisée égouttée, Cocktail de fruits au sirop appertisé égoutté, Salade de fruits au sirop appertisée égouttée

en: Canned drained fruit cocktail in light syrup, Canned drained fruit salad in light syrup
fr: Macédoine de fruits au sirop léger appertisée égouttée, Cocktail de fruits au sirop léger appertisé égoutté, Salade de fruits au sirop léger appertisée égouttée

en: Canned fruit cocktail in light syrup, Canned fruit salad in light syrup
fr: Macédoine de fruits au sirop léger appertisée, Cocktail de fruits au sirop léger appertisé, Salade de fruits au sirop léger appertisée

en: Canned fruit cocktail in syrup not drained, Canned fruit salad in syrup not drained
fr: Macédoine de fruits au sirop appertisé non égoutté, Cocktail de fruits au sirop appertisé non égoutté, Salade de fruits au sirop appertisé non égoutté

en: Fresh fruit salad
fr: Salades de fruits frais
he: סלט פירות טרי
hr: Svježa voćna salata
lt: Šviežių vaisių salotos
nl: Verse fruitsalade